Wyoming, session 2026, SF0124.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) There is appropriated fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000.00) from the Wyoming tourism reserve and
SF0124

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0349
projects account created in W.S. 39-15-111(p)(i)(B) to the
Wyoming office of tourism for purposes of providing funds
for and attracting a rodeo and cowboy museum and hall of
fame to Wyoming. This appropriation shall be distributed to
the office of tourism in accordance with subsection (b) of
this section. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2036. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose. Notwithstanding W.S.
9-2-1008 and 9-4-207, any unexpended, unobligated funds
from this appropriation shall not revert until June 30,
2036.

(b) The appropriation in subsection (a) of this
section shall be distributed to the office of tourism as
follows:

(i) Five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) shall
be distributed on July 1, 2026;

(ii) Five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) shall
be distributed on July 1, 2027;

SF0124

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0349
(iii) Five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) shall
be distributed on July 1, 2028.

(c) The appropriation provided in this section shall
be subject to all of the following:

(i) For the period beginning July 1, 2026 and
ending June 30, 2028, the appropriation in this section
shall take priority and be fully executed in each fiscal
year prior to any required transfers from the Wyoming
tourism reserve and projects account to the Wyoming outdoor
recreation and tourism trust fund account pursuant to 2023
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 153, Section 2;

(ii) The Wyoming tourism board shall solicit
applications for a grant under subsection (b) of this
section and reject or recommend approval of applications
for final action by the governor;

(iii) The Wyoming tourism board shall determine
and certify the relocation efforts have a reasonable
expectation of increasing tourism to Wyoming and generating
SF0124

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0349
additional jobs, gross state product, state revenue, and
economic diversification;

(iv) The expenditure of funds granted under this
section shall be conditioned upon expenditure of matching
funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of grant funds to
not less than one dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from any
nonstate source;

(v) Approval and allocation of any grant under
this section shall include a repayment provision if the
applicant accepts funds and does not relocate to Wyoming
not later than June 30, 2028;

(vi) Prior to final approval by the governor,
any proposed grant shall first be reviewed by the attorney
general, who shall certify the legality of the transaction
and all documents connected therewith;

(vii) The governor shall approve an applicant's
proposed grant only upon a determination that the
applicant's proposed relocation to Wyoming will result in
substantial benefit to the public.
SF0124

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0349

(d) Not later than November 1 of each year until
November 1, 2036, the office of tourism shall report to the
joint appropriations committee on the expenditures made
each fiscal year from the appropriation in subsection (a)
of this section.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.


(END)
SF0124